Utah statutes.
41-1a-223.   Registration without Utah title.

(1) (a)  If the owner of a vehicle operating interstate and registered in another state desires to retain registration of the vehicle in the other state, the applicant need not surrender but shall submit for inspection evidences of out-of-state registration.

(b)  The division upon a proper showing shall register the vehicle in this state.

(2) (a)  If a person is relocating from another jurisdiction and establishing residence in this state, whether temporary or permanent, and that person has a vehicle registered and titled in another jurisdiction and is not able to surrender title to the vehicle being registered in Utah because title is physically held by a lienholder, the  division may register the vehicle without issuing a Utah title.

(b)  Notwithstanding Section 70A-9a-316, the registration of a vehicle under this section does not alter or affect the rights or security interest of any lienholder in another jurisdiction.

